Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
(Framed by a constitutional convention which met in Cheyenne, Wyoming, from September 2, 1889 to September 30, 1889, and ratified by the voters November 5, 1889. The constitution became effective on July 10, 1890, on which date Wyoming was admitted as a state in the union. The constitution is printed herein as subsequently amended.)